New York, session 2025-2026, A1454.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 1045-g of the public authorities 2 law, as amended by chapter 467 of the laws of 2001, is amended to read 3 as follows: 4 4. To establish, fix, revise, charge and collect and enforce the 5 payment of all fees, rates, rents and other service charges for the use 6 of, or services furnished by the sewerage system, water system, or both, 7 as the case may be, so as to receive revenues which, together with other 8 revenues available to the board, if any, shall be at least sufficient at 9 all times so that such system or systems shall be placed on a self-sus- 10 taining basis in accordance with section one thousand forty-five-j of 11 this title; provided, however that the water board shall not establish a 12 limit of less than [four] six years commencing from the date of the bill 13 for services to challenge any fee, rate, rent or other service charges 14 for the use of or services furnished by the water and/or sewerage 15 systems; any such challenge shall specifically set forth the basis for 16 such claim; 17 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03948-01-5